Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.585

Motor vehicle transportation service—Powers and duties.

The director or the director's designee shall have general charge and supervision of state motor pools and motor vehicle transportation services under departmental administration and control.

The director or the director's designee shall (1) acquire by purchase or otherwise a sufficient number of motor vehicles to fulfill state agency needs for motor vehicle transportation service, (2) provide for necessary upkeep and repair, and (3) provide for servicing motor pool vehicles with fuel, lubricants, and other operating requirements.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 232; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.